New Jersey, session 221, S62.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, restaurants, cafeterias, dining establishments, and food courts, with or without a liquor license, bars, and all other holders of a liquor license with retail consumption privileges, collectively referred to as food or beverage establishments, may seat patrons in an open air space that has a fixed roof or temporary or seasonal awning or cover with at least two sides through which egress is possible, provided that the fixed roof or temporary or seasonal awning or cover is anchored, staked, or fastened in any manner. b.    A food or beverage establishment shall not seat a patron in an open air space as provided in subsection a. of this section if the roof, awning, or cover has accumulated more than two inches of snow, unless the roof, awning, or cover is certified pursuant to chapter 23 of Title 5 of the New Jersey Administrative Code to hold a snow load. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire upon the expiration of Executive Order No. 103, or any extension thereof or any replacement therefor.